Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.23, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Appropriation. deleted text begin For aids payable in 2023 and 2024, $15,000,000 is appropriated in each year from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make the payments required under this section.deleted text end For aids payable in 2025 and thereafter, deleted text begin $12,000,000deleted text end new text begin $20,000,000new text end is annually appropriated from the deleted text begin generaldeleted text end new text begin clean waternew text end fund to the commissioner of revenue to make the payments required under this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for aids payable in 2025 and thereafter. new text end